Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 12. Virginia Spill Response Council.

§ 62.1-44.34:24.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Council”
means the Virginia Spill Response Council.

“Discharge”
means spillage, leakage, pumping, pouring, seepage, emitting, dumping, emptying, injecting, escaping, leaching, fire, explosion, or other releases.

“Hazardous materials”
means substances or materials which may pose unreasonable risks to health, safety, property, or the environment when used, transported, stored, or disposed of, which may include materials which are solid, liquid, or gas.
Hazardous materials may include toxic substances, flammable and ignitable materials, explosives, corrosive materials, and radioactive materials and include (i) those substances or materials in a form or quantity which may pose an unreasonable risk to health, safety, or property when transported, and which the Secretary of Transportation of the United States has so designated by regulation or order; (ii) hazardous substances as defined or designated by law or regulation of the Commonwealth or law or regulation of the United States government; and (iii) hazardous waste as defined or designated by law or regulation of the Commonwealth.

“Oil”
means oil of any kind and in any form including, but not limited to, petroleum, fuel oil, sludge, oil refuse, oil mixed with waste, crude oils, and other liquid hydrocarbons regardless of specific gravity.

History.

1990, c. 598.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 598 enacted an Article 11 of this chapter, comprising §§

62.1-44.34:14

through

62.1-44.34:18

. Acts 1990, c. 917 enacted a new chapter 3.1:1 of this title, also comprising §§

62.1-44.34:14

through

62.1-44.34:18

. At the direction of the Code Commission, the sections added by c. 917 were codified as Article 11 of this chapter, comprising §§ 62.1-44.34:14 through 62.1-44.34:18, and the sections added by c. 598 were codified as Article 12 of this chapter, comprising §§

62.1-44.34:24

through

62.1-44.34:28

.

§ 62.1-44.34:25.
Virginia Spill Response Council created; purpose; membership.

There is hereby created the Virginia Spill Response Council. The purpose of the Council is to (i) improve the Commonwealth’s capability to respond in a timely and coordinated fashion to incidents involving the discharge of oil or hazardous materials which pose a threat to the environment, its living resources, and the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the Commonwealth and (ii) provide an ongoing forum for discussions between agencies which are charged with the prevention of, and response to, oil spills and hazardous materials incidents, and those agencies responsible for the remediation of such incidents.

The Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources and the Secretary of Public Safety and Homeland Security, upon the advice of the director of the agency, shall select one representative from each of the following agencies to serve as a member of the Council: Department of Emergency Management, State Water Control Board, Department of Environmental Quality, Virginia Marine Resources Commission, Department of Wildlife Resources, Department of Health, Department of Fire Programs, and the Council on the Environment.

The Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources or his designee shall serve as chairman of the Council.

History.

1990, c. 598; 1991, c. 66; 2014, cc. 115, 490; 2020, c. 958; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 115, effective March 3, 2014, and c. 490, effective April 2, 2014, are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “and Homeland Security.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in subsections B and C.

§ 62.1-44.34:26.
Responsibilities of the Council.

The Council shall have the following responsibilities:

To foster the exchange of information between the federal, state, and local government;

To enhance Virginia’s participation in the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s Region III Response Team;

To review and evaluate the response to emergency situations and recommend changes to the Commonwealth of Virginia’s Oil and Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Plan;

To provide ongoing analysis of the most recent technical developments for the remediation of discharges; and

To coordinate its activities with the Secure and Resilient Commonwealth Panel.

History.

1990, c. 598; 2011, cc. 594, 681.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Secure and Resilient Commonwealth Panel” was substituted for
“Virginia Emergency Response Council” in subdivision 5 to conform with Acts 2017, c. 512.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 594 and 681 are identical, and deleted “State Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Advisory Council and the” preceding “Virginia Emergency Response Council” in subdivision 5.

§ 62.1-44.34:27.
Cooperation of agencies and institutions.

Technical support shall be made available to the Council by the appropriate state agencies and educational institutions.

History.

1990, c. 598.

§ 62.1-44.34:28.
Council to submit annual report.

The Council shall submit a report annually to the Secretaries of Natural and Historic Resources and Transportation and Public Safety, which includes (i) an evaluation of the emergency response preparedness activities undertaken and the emergency response activities conducted during the year and (ii) a description of the activities of the Council during the year.

History.

1990, c. 598; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 401.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic.”